Massachusetts, session 194th, H2536.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 80B of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "dentists" in line 13 the word 
"psychologists."